Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-170
Militia; action or proceeding against member on active service; change of venue.

In any action or proceeding against a member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska for any act done when in active service of the state, such member, on appropriate motion, shall be entitled to have the venue changed to the nearest county in the adjoining judicial district; and in any suit against two or more members of the Nebraska National Guard, each of them shall be entitled to severance.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 68, p. 1603.